src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/NA_C_zhiishiib_gt-norm.yaml
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3+4: ozhiishiibimishini
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl: ozhiishiibimishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt: nizhiishiibimishiban
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: nizhiishiibimishidig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt: gizhiishiibimishiban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: gizhiishiibimishidig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt: ozhiishiibimishiban
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: ozhiishiibimishidig
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt: izhiishiibimishiban
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: izhiishiibimishidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 7
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+4: nizhiishiibimishan
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Loc: nizhiishiibimishing
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Pl: nizhiishiibimishag
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+4: gizhiishiibimishan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Loc: gizhiishiibimishing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Pl: gizhiishiibimishag
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+4: ozhiishiibimishan
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Loc: ozhiishiibimishing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Pl: ozhiishiibimishag
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+4: izhiishiibimishan
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Loc: izhiishiibimishing
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Pl: izhiishiibimishag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Prt: nizhiishiibiminaaniban
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nizhiishiibiminaanidig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Prt: gizhiishiibiminaaniban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gizhiishiibiminaanidig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Prt: gizhiishiibimiwaaban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: gizhiishiibimiwaadig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3+4+Prt: ozhiishiibiminiiban
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3+4+Voc+Pl: ozhiishiibiminiidig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Prt: ozhiishiibimiwaaban
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: ozhiishiibimiwaadig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 7
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+1+Pl+4: nizhiishiibiminaanin
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Loc: nizhiishiibiminaaning
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Pl: nizhiishiibiminaanig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+1+Pl+4: gizhiishiibiminaanin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Loc: gizhiishiibiminaaning
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Pl: gizhiishiibiminaanig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3+Pl+4: gizhiishiibimiwaan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Loc: gizhiishiibimiwaang
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Pl: gizhiishiibimiwaag
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3+4+4: ozhiishiibiminiwa
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3+4+Loc: ozhiishiibiminiing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3+4+Pl: ozhiishiibiminiwa
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3+Pl+4: ozhiishiibimiwaan
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Loc: ozhiishiibimiwaang
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Pl: ozhiishiibimiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6, 7
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Prt+4: nizhiishiibimibaniin
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Prt+Loc: nizhiishiibimibaniing
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Prt+Pl: nizhiishiibimibaniig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Prt+4: gizhiishiibimibaniin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Prt+Loc: gizhiishiibimibaniing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Prt+Pl: gizhiishiibimibaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Prt+4: ozhiishiibimibaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Prt+Loc: ozhiishiibimibaniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Prt+Pl: ozhiishiibimibaniig
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Prt+4: izhiishiibimibaniin
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Prt+Loc: izhiishiibimibaniing
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Prt+Pl: izhiishiibimibaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nizhiishiibishinaaniban
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nizhiishiibishinaanidig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gizhiishiibishinaaniban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gizhiishiibishinaanidig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: gizhiishiibishiwaaban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: gizhiishiibishiwaadig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3+4+Prt: ozhiishiibishiniiban
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl: ozhiishiibishiniidig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: ozhiishiibishiwaaban
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: ozhiishiibishiwaadig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 7
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+1+Pl+4: nizhiishiibishinaanin
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nizhiishiibishinaaning
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nizhiishiibishinaanig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+1+Pl+4: gizhiishiibishinaanin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gizhiishiibishinaaning
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gizhiishiibishinaanig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3+Pl+4: gizhiishiibishiwaan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: gizhiishiibishiwaang
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: gizhiishiibishiwaag
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3+4+4: ozhiishiibishiniwa
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3+4+Loc: ozhiishiibishiniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3+4+Pl: ozhiishiibishiniwa
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3+Pl+4: ozhiishiibishiwaan
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: ozhiishiibishiwaang
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: ozhiishiibishiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6, 7
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Prt+4: nizhiishiibishibaniin
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc: nizhiishiibishibaniing
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Prt+Pl: nizhiishiibishibaniig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Prt+4: gizhiishiibishibaniin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc: gizhiishiibishibaniing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Prt+Pl: gizhiishiibishibaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Prt+4: ozhiishiibishibaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc: ozhiishiibishibaniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Prt+Pl: ozhiishiibishibaniig
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Prt+4: izhiishiibishibaniin
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc: izhiishiibishibaniing
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Prt+Pl: izhiishiibishibaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6, 7
     1+zhiishiib+NA+1+Pl+Prt+4: nizhiishiibinaanibaniin
     1+zhiishiib+NA+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nizhiishiibinaanibaniing
     1+zhiishiib+NA+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nizhiishiibinaanibaniig
     1+zhiishiib+NA+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: nizhiishiibinaanidigan
     1+zhiishiib+NA+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: nizhiishiibinaanidiging
     1+zhiishiib+NA+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: nizhiishiibinaanidigag
     2+zhiishiib+NA+1+Pl+Prt+4: gizhiishiibinaanibaniin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gizhiishiibinaanibaniing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gizhiishiibinaanibaniig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gizhiishiibinaanidigan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gizhiishiibinaanidiging
     2+zhiishiib+NA+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gizhiishiibinaanidigag
     2+zhiishiib+NA+3+Pl+Prt+4: gizhiishiibiwaabaniin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: gizhiishiibiwaabaniing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: gizhiishiibiwaabaniig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gizhiishiibiwaadigan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gizhiishiibiwaadiging
     2+zhiishiib+NA+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gizhiishiibiwaadigag
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3+4+Prt+4: ozhiishiibiniibaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3+4+Prt+Loc: ozhiishiibiniibaniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3+4+Prt+Pl: ozhiishiibiniibaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: ozhiishiibiniidigan
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: ozhiishiibiniidiging
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: ozhiishiibiniidigag
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3+Pl+Prt+4: ozhiishiibiwaabaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: ozhiishiibiwaabaniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: ozhiishiibiwaabaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: ozhiishiibiwaadigan
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: ozhiishiibiwaadiging
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: ozhiishiibiwaadigag
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+4: zhiishiibenyishibaniin
     zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibenyishibaniing
     zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: zhiishiibenyishibaniig
     zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: zhiishiibensishibaniin
     zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: zhiishiibensishibaniing
     zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: zhiishiibensishibaniig
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl: nizhiishiibenyimishinaan
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl: nizhiishiibensimishinaan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl: gizhiishiibenyimishinaan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl: gizhiishiibenyimishiwaa
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl: gizhiishiibensimishinaan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl: gizhiishiibensimishiwaa
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4: ozhiishiibenyimishini
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl: ozhiishiibenyimishiwaa
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4: ozhiishiibensimishini
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl: ozhiishiibensimishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt: nizhiishiibenyimishiban
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: nizhiishiibenyimishidig
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt: nizhiishiibensimishiban
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: nizhiishiibensimishidig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt: gizhiishiibenyimishiban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: gizhiishiibenyimishidig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt: gizhiishiibensimishiban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: gizhiishiibensimishidig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt: ozhiishiibenyimishiban
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: ozhiishiibenyimishidig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt: ozhiishiibensimishiban
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: ozhiishiibensimishidig
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt: izhiishiibenyimishiban
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: izhiishiibenyimishidig
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt: izhiishiibensimishiban
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: izhiishiibensimishidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 7
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+4: nizhiishiibenyimishan
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: nizhiishiibenyimishing
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: nizhiishiibenyimishag
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+4: nizhiishiibensimishan
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: nizhiishiibensimishing
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: nizhiishiibensimishag
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+4: gizhiishiibenyimishan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: gizhiishiibenyimishing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: gizhiishiibenyimishag
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+4: gizhiishiibensimishan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: gizhiishiibensimishing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: gizhiishiibensimishag
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+4: ozhiishiibenyimishan
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: ozhiishiibenyimishing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: ozhiishiibenyimishag
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+4: ozhiishiibensimishan
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: ozhiishiibensimishing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: ozhiishiibensimishag
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+4: izhiishiibenyimishan
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: izhiishiibenyimishing
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: izhiishiibenyimishag
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+4: izhiishiibensimishan
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: izhiishiibensimishing
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: izhiishiibensimishag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 6
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+1+Pl+Prt: nizhiishiibenyiminaaniban
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nizhiishiibenyiminaanidig
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+1+Pl+Prt: nizhiishiibensiminaaniban
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nizhiishiibensiminaanidig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+1+Pl+Prt: gizhiishiibenyiminaaniban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gizhiishiibenyiminaanidig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+3+Pl+Prt: gizhiishiibenyimiwaaban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: gizhiishiibenyimiwaadig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+1+Pl+Prt: gizhiishiibensiminaaniban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gizhiishiibensiminaanidig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+3+Pl+Prt: gizhiishiibensimiwaaban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: gizhiishiibensimiwaadig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+3+4+Prt: ozhiishiibenyiminiiban
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+3+4+Voc+Pl: ozhiishiibenyiminiidig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+3+Pl+Prt: ozhiishiibenyimiwaaban
